DTC P0140 [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]


id0102f1805300

DTC P0140

A/F sensor no activity

DETECTION CONDITION
•  The PCM monitors the input signal from A/F sensor while the engine running. The A/F sensor signal does not change to rich from lean or to lean from rich for 100 s after the engine started. The PCM determines that the A/F sensor is not activity.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  A/F sensor deterioration
•  A/F sensor heater malfunction
•  Leakage exhaust system
•  Open circuit or short to ground in wiring harness between A/F sensor terminal A and PCM terminal 93
•  Open circuit or short to ground in wiring harness between A/F sensor terminal B and PCM terminal 85
•  Insufficient compression
•  Engine malfunction

Diagnostic procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

ACTION

1
VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
•  Has FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
2
VERIFY RELATED REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
•  Verify related service repair information availability.
•  Is any related repair information available?
Yes
Perform repair or diagnosis according to the available repair information.
•  If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
3
IDENTIFY TRIGGER DTC FOR FREEZE FRAME DATA
•  Is DTC P0140 on FREEZE FRAME DATA?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Go to troubleshooting procedures for DTC on FREEZE FRAME DATA.
4
VERIFY CURRENT INPUT SIGNAL STATUS
•  Warm up engine.
•  Access O2S11 PID using the M-MDS.
•  Verify PID while racing engine in NEUTRAL.
•  Is PID normal?
―  Less than 1 mA when suddenly depressing accelerator pedal (rich condition)
―  More than 1 mA just after releasing the accelerator pedal (lean condition)
Yes
Go to step 9.
No
Go to the next step.
5
INSPECT INSTALLATION OF A/F SENSOR
•  Inspect if the A/F sensor is loosely installed.
•  Is the sensor installed securely?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Install the sensor securely, then go to Step 11.
6
INSPECT GAS LEAKAGE FROM EXHAUST SYSTEM
•  Visually inspect if there is any gas leakage between the exhaust manifold and A/F sensor.
•  Is there gas leakage?
Yes
Repair or replace any malfunctioning exhaust part, then go to Step 11.
No
Go to the next step.
7
INSPECT A/F SENSOR CIRCUIT FOR OPEN CIRCUIT
•  Inspect for continuity between the following terminals:
―  A/F sensor terminal A (wiring harness-side) and PCM terminal 93 (wiring harness-side)
―  A/F sensor terminal B (wiring harness-side) and PCM terminal 85 (wiring harness-side)
•  Are there continuity?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair or replace the wiring harness for open circuit, then go to Step 11.
8
INSPECT A/F SENSOR CIRCUIT FOR SHORT TO GROUND
•  Inspect for continuity between the following terminals:
―  A/F sensor terminal A (wiring harness-side) and body ground
―  A/F sensor terminal B (wiring harness-side) and body ground
•  Are there continuity?
Yes
Repair or replace the wiring harness for short to ground, then go to Step 11.
No
Go to the next step.
9
INSPECT SEALING OF ENGINE COOLANT PASSAGE
•  Perform the ENGINE COOLANT LEAKAGE INSPECTION.
•  Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace the malfunctioning part according to inspection results, then go to Step 11.
No
Go to the next step.
10
INSPECT ENGINE COMPRESSION
•  Inspect the engine compression.
•  Is it normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Perform engine overhaul for repairs, then go to the next step.
11
VERIFY TROUBLESHOOTING OF DTC P0140 COMPLETED
•  Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
•  Turn the engine switch to the ON position (Engine off).
•  Clear the DTC from memory using the M-MDS.
•  Start the engine.
•  Perform the Repair Verification Drive Mode.
•  Is the PENDING CODE for this DTC present?
Yes
Replace the PCM, then go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
12
VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
•  Perform the “After Repair Procedure”.
•  Are any DTC present?
Yes
Go to the applicable DTC troubleshooting.
No
Troubleshooting completed.